District of Columbia statutes.
47-105

Applicability of antideficiency provisions.

The provisions of §§ 1341, 1342, and 1349 to 1351 and subchapter II of Chapter 15 of Title 31, United States Code, are hereby extended and made applicable in all respects to appropriations made for and expenditures of and to all of the officers and employees of the government of the District of Columbia.

June 26, 1912, 37 Stat. 184, ch. 182, § 9
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-105.
1973 Ed., § 47-105.